Hawaii statutes.
§128D-36 Funding. (a) The department
shall establish an account, to be called the voluntary response action account,
within the environmental response revolving fund pursuant to section 128D-2,
for the purpose of administration and oversight of this part.

(b) The $1,000 nonrefundable application fee
shall be deposited into the voluntary response action account.

(c) Upon initial approval of an application,
the department may require a deposit of up to $5,000 to initiate a
site-specific account. The department may require an additional deposit of up
to $5,000, whenever the balance of the site-specific account falls below
$1,000.

(d) If a site-specific account balance is
inadequate to support oversight, the department may discontinue oversight on
the voluntary response action. The department may pursue enforcement action
against the requesting party and any other person liable under section 128D-6,
pursuant to part I of this chapter, when an account balance is inadequate to
support further oversight by the department.

(e) At the completion of
the voluntary response action, or at the termination of the agreement, except
when the voluntary response action requires continuing oversight, the
department shall provide a final accounting of the site-specific account and
return the balance to the requesting party. [L 1997, c 377, pt of
§2; am L 2005, c 133, §4]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next